Hawaii statutes.
PART III.
LOANS AND INVESTMENTS

§412:7-300 Applicability of part. This
part sets forth the requirements and restrictions for lending and investments
by all savings and loan associations. A savings and loan association may make
loans and extensions of credit and may invest its assets as may be permitted by
this part and as may be provided elsewhere in this article. [L 1993, c 350, pt
of §1]

Previous
Vol08_Ch0401-0429
Next